Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 7
PRODUCT PACKAGING

12-8-160. Legislative findings and declarations.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

The management of solid waste can pose a wide range of hazards to public health and safety and to the environment;

Packaging comprises a significant percentage of the overall solid waste stream;

The presence of heavy metals in packaging is a concern in light of the likely presence of heavy metals in emissions or ash when packaging is incinerated or in leachate when packaging is landfilled;

Lead, mercury, cadmium, and hexavalent chromium, on the basis of available scientific and medical evidence, are of particular concern;

It is desirable as a first step in reducing the toxicity of packaging waste to eliminate the addition of heavy metals to packaging; and

It is desirable to achieve reduction in toxicity without impeding or discouraging the expanded use of postconsumer materials in the production of packaging and its components.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2968, § 1.)

12-8-161. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Distributor" means a person who takes title to products or packaging purchased for resale.

"Manufacturer" means a person who offers for sale or sells products or packaging to a distributor.

"Package" means a container which provides a means of marketing, protecting, or handling a product, including a unit package, intermediate package, or a shipping container. The term "package" also includes, but is not limited to, unsealed receptacles such as carrying cases, crates, cups, pails, rigid foil and other trays, wrappers and wrapping films, bags, and tubs.

"Packaging component" means any individual assembled part of a package, including but not limited to interior and exterior blocking, bracing, cushioning, weatherproofing, exterior strapping except for steel strapping which contains less than 100 ppm lead, coatings, closures, inks, labels, and tinplated steel that meets the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) specification A-623.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2968, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1101, § 5.)

12-8-162. Prohibition against sale of packages containing lead, cadmium, mercury, or hexavalent chromium; allowable concentration levels.

On and after July 1, 1994, no manufacturer or distributor shall offer for sale, sell, or offer for promotional purposes in this state a package or packaging component which includes, in the package itself or in any packaging component, inks, dyes, pigments, adhesives, stabilizers, or any other additives containing lead, cadmium, mercury, or hexavalent chromium which has been intentionally introduced as an element during manufacturing or distribution as opposed to the incidental presence of any of these elements and which exceeds the concentration level established by the board.

On and after July 1, 1994, no manufacturer or distributor shall offer for sale, sell, or offer for promotional purposes in this state a product in a package which includes, in the package itself or in any of the packaging components, inks, dyes, pigments, adhesives, stabilizers, or any other additives containing lead, cadmium, mercury, or hexavalent chromium which has been intentionally introduced as an element during manufacturing or distribution as opposed to the incidental presence of any of these elements and which exceeds the concentration level established by the board.

The sum of the concentration levels of lead, cadmium, mercury, and hexavalent chromium present in a package or packaging component established by the board shall not exceed the following:

Six hundred parts per million by weight on and after July 1, 1994;

Two hundred fifty parts per million by weight on and after July 1, 1995; and

One hundred parts per million by weight on and after July 1, 1996.

Concentration levels of lead, cadmium, mercury, and hexavalent chromium shall be determined using American standard of testing materials test methods, as revised, or United States Environmental Protection Agency test methods for evaluating solid waste, S-W 846, as revised.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2968, § 1.)

12-8-163. Exempt packaging.

The following packaging and packaging components are exempt from the requirements of this article:

Packaging or packaging components with a code indicating a date of manufacture prior to July 1, 1994;

Packages or packaging components to which lead, cadmium, mercury, or hexavalent chromium have been added in the manufacturing, forming, printing, or distribution process in order to comply with health or safety requirements of federal law or for which there is no feasible alternative if the manufacturer of a package or packaging component petitions the board for an exemption from the provisions of this article for a particular package or packaging component. The board may grant a two-year exemption, if warranted by the circumstances, and an exemption may, upon meeting either criterion of this paragraph, be renewed for two years. For purposes of this paragraph, a use for which there is no feasible alternative is one in which the regulated substance is essential to the protection, safe handling, or function of the package's contents;

Packages and packaging components that would not exceed the maximum contaminant levels established but for the addition of postconsumer materials; or

All alcohol products bottled prior to January 1, 1994.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-163

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2968, § 1.)

12-8-164. Certificates of compliance.

On and after July 1, 1994, each manufacturer or distributor of packaging or packaging components shall make available to purchasers, the board, and the general public, upon request, certificates of compliance which state that the manufacturer's or distributor's packaging or packaging components comply with, or are exempt from, the requirements of this article. If the manufacturer or distributor of the package or packaging component reformulates or creates a new package or packaging component, the manufacturer or distributor shall provide an amended or new certificate of compliance for the reformulated or new package or packaging component.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-164

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2968, § 1.)

12-8-165. Rules and regulations.

The board shall be authorized to adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, and repeal rules and regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of this article as the board may deem necessary.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-165

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2968, § 1.)

12-8-166. Violation of article.

Any person who violates any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-166

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2968, § 1.)